North Dakota, session 69, HB1227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 1-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Standard time.
1. Under 15 U.S.C. 260(a), the state is exempt from the establishment of daylight saving
time.
2. Greenwich mean time minus five hours is the official standard time of the portions of
the state in the central time zone.
3. Greenwich mean time minus six hours is the official standard time of the portions of
the state in the mountain time zone.
4. This section may not affect the standard time established by United States law
governing the movements of common carriers engaged in interstate commerce or the
time for performance of an act by an officer or department of the United States, as
established by a statute, lawful order, rule, or regulation of the United States or an
agency of the United States.
SECTION 2. REPEAL. Section 40-01-20 of the North Dakota Century Code is repealed.
Page No. 1 25.0787.01000